Nevada, session 83, AB590.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Office of the Military for facilities maintenance
projects for Nevada National Guard facilities the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ............................... $1,018,487
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ............................... $1,018,487
2. Expenditure of the following sums not appropriated from the
State General Fund or the State Highway Fund is hereby authorized
by the Office of the Military for the same purposes as set forth in
subsection 1:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ............................... $2,164,630
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ............................... $2,164,630
3. The sums appropriated by subsection 1 are available for
either fiscal year. Any remaining balance of those sums must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30, 2027, by the entity to
which the appropriation is made or any entity to which money from
the appropriation is granted or otherwise transferred in any manner,
and any portion of the appropriated money remaining must not be
spent for any purpose after September 17, 2027, by either the entity
to which the money was appropriated or the entity to which the
money was subsequently granted or transferred, and must be
reverted to the State General Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 2. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Office of the Military for the purchase of
facilities maintenance equipment the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................. $117,723
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................. $101,256
2. Expenditure of the following sums not appropriated from the
State General Fund or the State Highway Fund is hereby authorized
by the Office of the Military for the same purposes as set forth in
subsection 1:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................... $98,172
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ...................................... $2,100
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
3. The sums appropriated by subsection 1 are available for
either fiscal year. Any remaining balance of those sums must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30, 2027, by the entity to
which the appropriation is made or any entity to which money from
the appropriation is granted or otherwise transferred in any manner,
and any portion of the appropriated money remaining must not be
spent for any purpose after September 17, 2027, by either the entity
to which the money was appropriated or the entity to which the
money was subsequently granted or transferred, and must be
reverted to the State General Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 3. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Office of the Military for the State Active Duty
budget account for the costs of the Nevada National Guard
Resiliency Program the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................. $250,000
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................. $250,000
2. The sums appropriated by subsection 1 are available for
either fiscal year. Any remaining balance of those sums must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30, 2027, by the entity to
which the appropriation is made or any entity to which money from
the appropriation is granted or otherwise transferred in any manner,
and any portion of the appropriated money remaining must not be
spent for any purpose after September 17, 2027, by either the entity
to which the money was appropriated or the entity to which the
money was subsequently granted or transferred, and must be
reverted to the State General Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 4. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Office of the Military the sum of $4,164,800 for
a payment associated with the termination of an agreement between
the Federal Government and the State requiring the maintenance of
members of the Nevada National Guard at the National Guard
facility in Carlin.
2. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
Sec. 5. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)